District of Columbia statutes.
29-1206.05

Redemption of beneficial interest.

A statutory trust may acquire, by purchase, redemption, or otherwise, any beneficial interest in the trust or series thereof. A beneficial interest acquired under this section shall be canceled.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 605 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.